District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-101

Definition and penalty.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1322, ch. 854, § 809
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 93, ch. 159, § 203
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 28, 36 DCR 492
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 3(a), 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 22-201.
1973 Ed., § 22-201.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 209(a) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Section 209(a) of D.C. Law 19-317 purported to amend this section, but it had previously been repealed.